Vermont, session 2025-2026, H350.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4013 is amended to read:
§ 4013. ZIP GUNS; SWITCHBLADE KNIVES
A person who possesses, sells, or offers for sale a weapon commonly
known as a “zip” gun, or a weapon commonly known as a switchblade knife,
the blade of which is three inches or more in length, shall be imprisoned not
more than 90 days or fined not more than $100.00, or both.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378812 v.1